Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. Prostitution

Cross references. —

As to prostitution being a nuisance, see §

6-6-201

.

As to a place of prostitution being a public nuisance, see §

6-6-209

.

For general powers of cities and towns to restrain and punish prostitutes, see §

15-1-103

.

As to authority of state, county and municipal health officers to use every proper means for the suppression of prostitution, see §

35-4-133

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality of assault and battery laws limited to protection of females only or which provide greater penalties for males than for females, 5 ALR4th 708.

Liability of church or religious society for sexual misconduct of clergy, 5 ALR5th 530.

§ 6-4-101.
Prostitution; penalties.

Except as provided in W.S.

6-2-701

through

6-2-710

, a person who knowingly or intentionally performs or permits, or offers or agrees to perform or permit an act of sexual intrusion, as defined by W.S. 6-2-301(a)(vii), for money or other property commits prostitution which is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2013 ch. 91, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “Except as provided in W.S.

6-2-701

through

6-2-710

.”

Cited

in

Belondon v. City of Casper, 456 P.2d 238,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1969).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Laws prohibiting or regulating “escort services,” “outcall entertainment” or similar services used to carry on prostitution, 15 ALR5th 900.

§ 6-4-102.
Soliciting an act of prostitution; penalties.

Except as provided in W.S.

6-2-701

through

6-2-710

, a person is guilty of soliciting an act of prostitution if, with the intent that an act of sexual intrusion as defined by W.S. 6-2-301(a)(vii) be committed, that person knowingly or intentionally pays, or offers or agrees to pay money or other property to another person under circumstances strongly corroborative of the intention that an act of prostitution be committed. Soliciting an act of prostitution is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1996, ch. 117, § 1; 2013 ch. 91, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, added “Except as provided in W.S.

6-2-701

through

6-2-710

.”

Agreement transferring automobile in exchange for sexual favors unlawful and void. —

An agreement to transfer an automobile to a buyer in exchange for $100 and 100 sexual favors violated this section, was contrary to public policy, and was void and unenforceable. Hamburg v. Hansen, 683 P.2d 662,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 302

(Wyo. 1984).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-4-103.
Promoting prostitution; penalties.

Except as provided in W.S.

6-2-701

through

6-2-710

, a person commits a felony if he:

Knowingly or intentionally entices or compels another person to become a prostitute;

Knowingly or intentionally procures, or offers or agrees to procure, a person for another person for the purpose of prostitution;

Having control over the use of a place, knowingly or intentionally permits another person to use the place for prostitution; or

Receives money or other property from a prostitute, without lawful consideration, knowing it was earned in whole or in part from prostitution.

The felony defined by this section is punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00), or both. However, the crime is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both, under paragraph (i) of subsection (a) of this section if the person enticed or compelled is under eighteen (18) years of age.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 2013 ch. 91, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to place of prostitution being a nuisance, see §

6-6-201

.

As to place of prostitution being a public nuisance, see §

6-6-209

.

As to general powers of cities and towns to suppress, restrain and prohibit houses of prostitution, see §

15-1-103

.

As to duty of health officers to enforce laws for suppression of prostitution, see §

35-4-133

.

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, added “Except as provided in W.S.

6-2-701

through

6-2-710

” in (a).

Evidence sufficient for conviction. —

Evidence, including testimony from a police officer and a former “employee” of the defendant, plus records and a telephone answering machine tape, was sufficient to support the defendant's conviction for procuring and receiving money from prostitution. See Osborne v. State, 806 P.2d 272,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1991).

Condition of probation. —

Where a defendant entered Alford guilty pleas to violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

6-2-502

,

6-4-103

,

6-1-303

, and

6-2-302

, the district court did not abuse its discretion by imposing as a condition of his probation following his term of incarceration that he have no contact with his minor children. A no contact condition was reasonably related to the violent sexual crimes for which he was convicted and for which he was charged, and the provision did not impermissibly encroach on his fundamental right as a parent to raise his children. Perkins v. State, 2014 WY 11, 317 P.3d 584,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

Stutsman v. City of Cheyenne, 18 Wyo. 499, 113 P. 322,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1911); Konopisos v. State, 26 Wyo. 350, 185 P. 355,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1919).

Cited

in

State in Interest of C., 638 P.2d 165,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 410

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Judicial Construction of the Mann Act,” see 10 Wyo. L.J. 198.

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction of provision of pandering statute as to placing a female in charge or custody of another, 54 ALR2d 1178.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance proscribing solicitation for purposes of prostitution, lewdness, or assignation — modern cases, 77 ALR3d 519.

Separate acts of taking earnings of or support from prostitute as separate or continuing offenses of pimping, 3 ALR4th 1195.